Nevada, session 83, AB76.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 678A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto the provisions set forth as sections 1.5 to 6, inclusive,
of this act.
Sec. 1.5. “Label” means written or printed material affixed
to or included with cannabis or a cannabis product to provide
identification or other information.
Sec. 2. “Local governmental jurisdiction” means a city or
unincorporated area within a county.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
Sec. 2.5. “Packaging” means the immediate, consumer-
facing wrapper or container in which cannabis or a cannabis
product is packaged.
Sec. 3. 1. “Usable cannabis” means the dried leaves and
flowers of a plant of the genus Cannabis, and any mixture or
preparation thereof, that are appropriate for the medical use of
cannabis or the adult use of cannabis.
2. The term does not include the seeds, stalks and roots of the
plant.
Sec. 4. The Board or an agent of the Board may refuse to
reveal, in any court or administrative proceeding, except a
proceeding brought by the State of Nevada:
1. The identity of any person who has furnished to the Board
information purporting to reveal the commission of a violation of
a provision of this title or the regulations adopted pursuant
thereto, including, without limitation, information concerning
unlicensed cannabis activities;
2. The information obtained by the Board from a person
described in subsection 1; or
3. Both the identity of a person described in subsection 1 and
the information obtained from the person.
Sec. 5. The Board shall appoint one or more hearing officers
to conduct hearings and render decisions as provided in NRS
678A.520 to 678A.600, inclusive, and section 6 of this act.
Sec. 6. 1. Unless a review by the Board is requested by a
party or initiated by the Board pursuant to subsection 2 or 3, the
decision and order of a hearing officer issued pursuant to NRS
678A.590 are final and not subject to review by any court or the
Board.
2. A party who is aggrieved by the decision and order of a
hearing officer issued pursuant to NRS 678A.590 may submit to
the Board a written request for a review of the decision and order
within 30 calendar days after the service of the decision and order.
3. The Board may, on its own motion, initiate a review of the
decision and order of a hearing officer issued pursuant to NRS
678A.590 within 30 days after the service of the decision and
order.
4. If requested or initiated in accordance with subsection 2 or
3, the Board shall conduct a review of the decision and order of
the hearing officer. The review must be limited to the record of the
proceedings before the hearing officer. The Board may not
consider any additional evidence which was not presented to the
hearing officer.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
5. The Board may, at the request of a party or on its own
motion, provide for oral argument as part of a review conducted
pursuant to this section. The Chair of the Board shall determine
the time, place and any other conditions and requirements for any
such oral argument.
6. After the conclusion of a review conducted pursuant to this
section, the Board may affirm, modify or reverse the decision and
order of the hearing officer or remand the matter to the hearing
officer for further proceedings. The Board shall prepare a written
decision and order on the matter as expeditiously as possible and
serve the decision and order on the parties personally or by
certified mail.
Sec. 7. NRS 678A.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678A.010 As used in this title, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 678A.020 to
678A.240, inclusive, and sections 1.5 to 3, inclusive, of this act
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 8. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 9. NRS 678A.150 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678A.150 “Electronic verification and authentication system”
means an electronic database that:
1. Keeps track of data in real time; and
2. Is accessible by the Board and by the cannabis
establishment.
Sec. 10. NRS 678A.239 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678A.239 1. “Synthetic cannabinoid” means a cannabinoid
that is:
[1.] (a) Produced artificially, whether from chemicals or from
recombinant biological agents, including, without limitation, yeast
and algae; [and
2. Is not derived] or
(b) Not obtained directly without the use of a chemical reagent
from a plant of the genus Cannabis . [, including,]
2. The term includes, without limitation, biosynthetic
cannabinoids.
3. The term does not include THC produced through the
decarboxylation of tetrahydrocannabinolic acid using a process
approved by the Board.
Sec. 11. NRS 678A.450 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678A.450 1. The Board may adopt regulations necessary or
convenient to carry out the provisions of this title. Such regulations
may include, without limitation:
(a) Financial requirements for licensees.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
(b) Establishing such education, outreach, investigative and
enforcement mechanisms as the Board deems necessary to ensure
the compliance of a licensee or registrant with the provisions of this
title. Such mechanisms must include, without limitation:
(1) A system to educate, train and certify employees of the
Board which:
(I) Each employee must complete before he or she may
engage in inspections, investigations or audits; and
(II) At a minimum, includes training that is the same or
substantially similar to any training that is required by the Board by
regulation to be completed by a cannabis establishment agent before
he or she may be employed by, volunteer at or provide labor to a
cannabis establishment;
(2) A system to educate and advise licensees and registrants
on compliance with the provisions of this title which may serve as
an alternative to disciplinary action; and
(3) Establishing specific grounds for disciplinary action
against a licensee or registrant who knowingly violates the law or
engages in grossly negligent, unlawful or criminal conduct or an act
or omission that poses an imminent threat to the health or safety of
the public.
(c) Requirements for licensees or registrants relating to the
cultivation, processing, manufacture, transport, distribution, testing,
study, advertising and sale of cannabis and cannabis products.
(d) Policies and procedures to ensure that the cannabis industry
in this State is economically competitive, inclusive of racial
minorities, women and persons and communities that have been
adversely affected by cannabis prohibition and accessible to persons
of low-income seeking to start a business.
(e) Policies and procedures relating to the disclosure of the
identities of the shareholders and the annual report of a cannabis
establishment that is a publicly traded company.
(f) Reasonable restrictions on the signage, marketing, display
and advertising of cannabis establishments. Such a restriction must
not require a cannabis establishment to obtain the approval of the
Board before using a logo, sign or advertisement.
(g) Provisions governing the sales of products and commodities
made from hemp, as defined in NRS 557.160, or containing
cannabidiol by cannabis establishments.
(h) Requirements relating to the packaging and labeling of
cannabis and cannabis products. Such requirements must not
require:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
(1) Any package of cannabis or cannabis products which is
sold at wholesale to contain any label or tag other than a label or
tag necessary for the functionality of any computer software used
for the seed-to-sale tracking of cannabis adopted by the Board.
(2) A cannabis establishment to include any information on
the label for cannabis or a cannabis product that is already
included on the packaging of the cannabis or cannabis product.
2. The Board shall adopt regulations providing for the
gathering and maintenance of comprehensive demographic
information, including, without limitation, information regarding
race, ethnicity, age and gender, concerning each:
(a) Owner and manager of a cannabis establishment.
(b) Holder of a cannabis establishment agent registration card.
3. The Board shall adopt regulations providing for the
investigation of unlicensed cannabis activities and the imposition of
penalties against persons who engage in such activities. Such
regulations must, without limitation:
(a) Establish penalties to be imposed for unlicensed cannabis
activities, which may include, without limitation, the issuance of a
cease and desist order or citation, the imposition of an
administrative fine or civil penalty and other similar penalties.
(b) Set forth the procedures by which the Board may impose a
penalty against a person for engaging in unlicensed cannabis
activities.
(c) Set forth the circumstances under which the Board is
required to refer matters concerning unlicensed cannabis activities
to an appropriate state or local law enforcement agency.
4. As part of an investigation of unlicensed cannabis
activities conducted pursuant to the regulations adopted pursuant
to subsection 3, if the Board has cause to believe that a person has
engaged in or is engaging in unlicensed cannabis activities, the
Board may issue a summons to require any person to appear
before the Board at the time and place set forth in the summons
and a subpoena to require the testimony of any person or the
production of documents. The Board may administer an oath or
affirmation to any person providing testimony pursuant to such a
subpoena. A summons or subpoena issued pursuant to this
subsection must be served upon a person in the manner required
for service of process in this State or by certified mail with return
receipt requested. An employee of the Board may personally serve
such a summons or subpoena. The Board may use any documents,
records or material produced pursuant to a subpoena issued
pursuant to this subsection in the course of an action or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
proceeding brought pursuant to the regulations adopted pursuant
to subsection 3.
5. The Board shall transmit the information gathered and
maintained pursuant to subsection 2 to the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmission to the Legislature on or
before January 1 of each odd-numbered year.
[5.] 6. The Board shall, by regulation, establish a pilot
program for identifying opportunities for an emerging small
cannabis business to participate in the cannabis industry. As used in
this subsection, “emerging small cannabis business” means a
cannabis-related business that:
(a) Is in existence, operational and operated for a profit;
(b) Maintains its principal place of business in this State; and
(c) Satisfies requirements for the number of employees and
annual gross revenue established by the Board by regulation.
Sec. 12. NRS 678A.470 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678A.470 1. The Board shall cause to be made and kept a
record of all proceedings at regular and special meetings of the
Board. These records are open to public inspection.
2. [Any] Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3, 4 and
6, any and all information and data prepared or obtained by the
Board or by an agent or employee of the Board [relating to a holder
of or an applicant for a medical cannabis establishment license
pursuant to NRS 678B.210, other than the name of a licensee and
each owner, officer and board member of the licensee and
information relating to the scoring and ranking of applications
and the imposition of disciplinary action, are confidential and may
be revealed in whole or in part only in the course of the necessary
administration of this title or upon the lawful order of a court of
competent jurisdiction. The Board may reveal such information and
data to an authorized agent of any agency of the United States
Government, any state or any political subdivision of a state or the
government of any foreign country. Notwithstanding any other
provision of state law, such information and data may not be
otherwise revealed without specific authorization by the Board
pursuant to the regulations of the Board.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, any
information and data included in] :
(a) Relating to an application for [an adult-use cannabis
establishment] a license or a registration card , a request for a
transfer of ownership interest pursuant to the regulations adopted
by the Board pursuant to NRS 678B.380 or a request to obtain the
approval of the Board of any act, transaction, qualification,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
extension or exemption for which the approval of the Board is
required pursuant to this title or the regulations adopted pursuant
thereto and which is given at a meeting of the Board;
(b) That is required by the Board to be provided to the Board
pursuant to this title or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto or
which may be otherwise obtained relative to the finances, earnings
or revenue of any licensee, registrant or applicant for a license or
registration card;
(c) Pertaining to the criminal record, antecedents and
background of a natural person;
(d) For which an assurance that the information and data will
be held in confidence and treated as confidential has been
provided in writing by the Board or an agent or employee of the
Board who has been authorized by the Board to provide such an
assurance;
(e) Relating to the internal layout and structural elements of a
cannabis establishment;
(f) Relating to the security of a cannabis establishment,
including, without limitation, the security measures and
emergency preparedness of a cannabis establishment and any
assessment of threats to or vulnerabilities of a cannabis
establishment;
(g) That constitutes a trade secret, as defined in NRS
600A.030, and for which the word “Confidential” or “Private” or
another indication of secrecy was placed in a reasonably
noticeable manner on any medium or container that describes or
includes any portion of the trade secret at the time it was provided
to the Board or an agent or employee of the Board;
(h) That contains the name or other personal information of a
natural person who facilitates or delivers services in accordance
with the provisions of this title and the regulations adopted
pursuant thereto;
(i) Whose disclosure would likely prejudice the effectiveness of
the operations of a law enforcement agency;
(j) Relating to the activities of a licensee or registrant involving
the medical use of cannabis; or
(k) Relating to disciplinary action taken in accordance with
NRS 678A.520 to 678A.600, inclusive, and section 6 of this act or
an audit, inspection or investigation,
 is confidential and may be revealed in whole or in part only in the
course of the necessary administration of this title or upon the lawful
order of a court of competent jurisdiction. [The name of the holder
of an adult-use cannabis establishment license and each owner,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
officer and board member of the licensee and information relating to
the scoring and ranking of applications and the imposition of
disciplinary action are not confidential.]
3. The following information and data are not confidential:
(a) The name of a licensee.
(b) The name of each owner, officer and board member of a
licensee.
(c) The name of the receiver for a cannabis establishment
subject to receivership.
(d) The physical address of a cannabis sales facility or
cannabis consumption lounge.
(e) The local governmental jurisdiction in which a cannabis
establishment is located.
(f) Information and data relating to the scoring and ranking of
applications for a license.
(g) A complaint served pursuant to NRS 678A.520.
(h) A decision and order issued pursuant to NRS 678A.590 or
section 6 of this act, including, without limitation, any information
and data relating to any civil penalty imposed by such a decision
and order.
(i) A consent or settlement agreement entered into pursuant to
NRS 678A.645, including, without limitation, any information and
data relating to any civil penalty imposed by such a consent or
settlement agreement.
4. The Board may reveal [such] information and data declared
confidential pursuant to subsection 2 to an authorized agent of any
[agency of the United States Government, any state or any political
subdivision of a state or the government of any foreign country.]
governmental entity. If any confidential information and data is
provided by the Board to a governmental entity pursuant to this
section, the information and data remains confidential and may
not be provided to any other person or governmental entity. To the
extent practicable, any governmental entity that receives any
confidential information and data from the Board pursuant to this
section shall treat the information and data as confidential.
Notwithstanding any other provision of state law, [such] information
and data declared confidential pursuant to subsection 2 may not be
otherwise revealed without specific authorization by the Board
pursuant to the regulations of the Board.
[4.] 5. A person seeking an order of a court of competent
jurisdiction for the disclosure of information and data declared
confidential pursuant to subsection 2 must submit a motion in
writing to the court requesting the information. At least 14 days
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
before submitting the motion, the person must provide notice to
the Board, the Attorney General and all persons who may be
affected by the disclosure of the information and data. The notice
must:
(a) Include, without limitation, a copy of the motion and all
documents in support of the motion that are to be filed with the
court; and
(b) Be delivered in person or by certified mail to the last known
address of each person to whom notice must be provided.
6. The Board may reveal information and data declared
confidential pursuant to subsection 2 to the extent necessary to
establish a claim or defense in an action against the Board
brought by a licensee, registrant or applicant for a license or
registration card. The court may order the redaction or sealing of
any court records containing confidential information and data
revealed pursuant to this subsection to maintain the confidentiality
of the information and data.
7. All files, records, reports and other information and data
pertaining to matters related to cannabis in the possession of the
Nevada Tax Commission or the Department of Taxation must be
made available to the Board as is necessary to the administration of
this title.
[5.] 8. As used in this section [, “information] :
(a) “Governmental entity” means any agency of the United
States Government, any state or political subdivision of a state or
the government of any foreign country.
(b) “Information and data” means all information and data in
any form, including, without limitation, any oral, written, audio,
visual, digital or electronic form, and the term includes, without
limitation, any account, book, correspondence, file, message, paper,
record, report or other type of document . [, including, without
limitation, any document containing self-evaluative assessments,
self-critical analysis or self-appraisals of an applicant’s or licensee’s
compliance with statutory or regulatory requirements.]
(c) “Personal information” means:
(1) The name, address, telephone number, electronic mail
address or date of birth of a person; and
(2) Any other information that constitutes personal
information as defined in NRS 603A.040.
Sec. 13. NRS 678A.500 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678A.500 1. If the Executive Director becomes aware that a
licensee or registrant has violated, is violating or is about to violate
any provision of this title or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
the Executive Director may transmit the details of the suspected
violation, along with any further facts or information related to the
violation which are known to the Executive Director, to the
Attorney General [.] for further investigation.
2. If any person other than the Executive Director becomes
aware that a licensee or registrant has violated, is violating or is
about to violate any provision of this title or any regulation adopted
pursuant thereto, the person may file a written complaint with the
Executive Director specifying the relevant facts. The Executive
Director shall review each such complaint and, if the Executive
Director finds the complaint not to be frivolous, may transmit the
details of the suspected violation, along with any further facts or
information derived from the review of the complaint to the
Attorney General [.] for further investigation.
3. The employees of the Board who are certified by the Peace
Officers’ Standards and Training Commission created pursuant to
NRS 289.500 shall cooperate with the Attorney General in the
performance of any criminal investigation.
Sec. 14. NRS 678A.510 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678A.510 1. If the Executive Director transmits the details of
a suspected violation to the Attorney General for further
investigation pursuant to NRS 678A.500, the Attorney General shall
conduct an investigation of the suspected violation to determine
whether it warrants proceedings for disciplinary action of the
licensee or registrant. If the Attorney General determines that
further proceedings are warranted, he or she shall report the results
of the investigation together with a recommendation to the
Executive Director in a manner which does not violate the right of
the person charged in the complaint to due process in any later
hearing on the complaint. The Executive Director shall transmit the
recommendation and other information received from the Attorney
General to the Board.
2. The Board shall promptly make a determination with respect
to each complaint resulting in an investigation by the Attorney
General. The Board shall:
(a) [Dismiss the complaint;] Decline to proceed with
disciplinary action;
(b) [Enter into] Authorize the Attorney General to attempt to
negotiate a consent or settlement agreement [with] to be entered
into between the licensee or registrant and the Board pursuant to
NRS 678A.645; or
(c) Proceed with appropriate disciplinary action in accordance
with NRS 678A.520 to 678A.600, inclusive, and section 6 of this
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
act, chapter 233B of NRS and the regulations adopted by the Board.
In determining the disciplinary action to impose the Board shall
consider mitigating factors pursuant to NRS 678A.647.
Sec. 15. NRS 678A.520 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678A.520 1. If the Board proceeds with disciplinary action
pursuant to NRS 678A.510, the Board or the Executive Director
shall serve a complaint upon the respondent . [either personally, or
by]
2. A complaint served pursuant to subsection 1 must be
served upon the respondent:
(a) Personally;
(b) By registered or certified mail at the address of the
respondent that is on file with the Board [. Such] ; or
(c) If the respondent has expressly agreed to service by
electronic means, by electronic means.
3. A complaint served pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) [Be a written statement of charges;
(b) Set forth in ordinary and concise language the acts or
omissions with which the respondent is charged;
(c)] Specify the statutes and regulations which the respondent is
alleged to have violated . [;
(d) Not consist merely of charges raised in the language of the
statutes or regulations which the respondent is alleged to have
violated;
(e)] (b) Set forth a short and plain statement of the matters
asserted, including, without limitation, the acts or omissions with
which the respondent is charged.
(c) If the respondent is alleged to have committed multiple
violations consisting of the same or a similar act, omission or course
of conduct, charge those violations as a single alleged violation if
the violations:
(1) Are closely related in time, place and circumstance; and
(2) Were all discovered in the course of a single audit,
inspection or investigation . [;
(f)] (d) Specify the penalty being sought against the respondent
. [; and
(g)] (e) Provide notice of the right of the respondent to request a
hearing.
[2.] 4. The Chair of the Board may grant an extension to
respond to the complaint for good cause. Unless granted such an
extension, the respondent must , [answer] within [20] 21 days after
the service of the complaint [.] , answer the complaint in
accordance with subsection 5.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
5. In the answer to a complaint, the respondent:
(a) Must state in short and plain terms the defenses to each claim
asserted.
(b) Must admit or deny the facts alleged in the complaint.
(c) Must state which allegations the respondent is without
knowledge or information to form a belief as to their truth. Such
allegations shall be deemed denied.
(d) Must affirmatively set forth any matter which constitutes an
avoidance or affirmative defense.
(e) May demand a hearing. Failure to demand a hearing
constitutes a waiver of the right to a hearing [and] , the right to
[judicial] request a review of [any] the decision or order of the
hearing officer by the Board [, but] and the right to judicial review
of any decision of the Board . [may order a hearing even if the
respondent so waives his or her right.
3.] 6. Upon receipt of an answer demanding a hearing or the
expiration of the time to answer the complaint, the Board shall
assign the matter to a hearing officer.
7. Failure to [answer] comply with subsection 4 or , if the
respondent has demanded a hearing pursuant to subsection 5, to
appear at the hearing constitutes an admission by the respondent of
all facts alleged in the complaint. The [Board] hearing officer may
take action based on such an admission and on other evidence
without further notice to the respondent. If the [Board] hearing
officer takes action based on such an admission, the [Board]
hearing officer shall include in the record which evidence was the
basis for the action.
[4.] 8. The [Board] hearing officer shall determine the time
and place of the hearing as soon as is reasonably practical after
receiving the respondent’s answer. The [Board] hearing officer
shall deliver or send by registered [or] mail, certified mail or, if the
parties have expressly agreed to service by electronic means, by
electronic means a notice of hearing that complies with NRS
233B.121 to all parties at least 10 days before the hearing. The
hearing must be held within [45] 120 days after receiving the
respondent’s answer unless an expedited hearing is determined to be
appropriate by the Executive Director or the Board, in which event
the hearing must be held as soon as practicable. The [Chair of the
Board] hearing officer may grant one or more extensions to the [45-
day] 120-day requirement pursuant to a request of a party or an
agreement by both parties.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
Sec. 16. NRS 678A.530 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678A.530 Before a hearing [, before the Board,] and during a
hearing upon reasonable cause shown, the [Board] hearing officer
shall issue subpoenas and subpoenas duces tecum at the request of a
party. All witnesses appearing pursuant to subpoena, other than
parties, officers or employees of the State of Nevada or any political
subdivision thereof, are entitled to receive fees and mileage in the
same amounts and under the same circumstances as provided by law
for witnesses in civil actions in the district courts. Witnesses entitled
to fees or mileage who attend hearings at points so far removed
from their residences as to prohibit return thereto from day to day
are entitled, in addition to witness fees and in lieu of mileage, to the
per diem compensation for subsistence and transportation authorized
for state officers and employees for each day of actual attendance
and for each day necessarily occupied in traveling to and from the
hearings. Fees, subsistence and transportation expenses must be paid
by the party at whose request the witness is subpoenaed. [The Board
may award as costs the amount of all such expenses to the
prevailing party.]
Sec. 17. NRS 678A.540 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678A.540 1. At all hearings before [the Board:] a hearing
officer:
(a) Oral evidence may be taken only upon oath or affirmation
administered by the [Board.] hearing officer.
(b) Every party has the right to:
(1) Call and examine witnesses;
(2) Introduce exhibits relevant to the issues of the case;
(3) Cross-examine opposing witnesses on any matters
relevant to the issues of the case, even though the matter was not
covered in a direct examination;
(4) Impeach any witness regardless of which party first
called the witness to testify; and
(5) Offer rebuttal evidence.
(c) If the respondent does not testify in his or her own behalf,
the respondent may be called and examined as if under cross-
examination.
(d) The hearing need not be conducted according to technical
rules relating to evidence and witnesses, except that those prescribed
in NRS 233B.123 apply. Any relevant evidence that is not
immaterial or unduly repetitious may be admitted and is sufficient in
itself to support a finding if it is the sort of evidence on which
responsible persons are accustomed to rely in the conduct of serious
affairs, regardless of the existence of any common law or statutory
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
rule which might make improper the admission of such evidence
over objection in a civil action.
(e) The parties or their counsel may by written stipulation agree
that certain specified evidence may be admitted even though such
evidence might otherwise be subject to objection.
2. The [Board] hearing officer may take official notice of any
generally accepted information or technical or scientific matter
within the field of cannabis, and of any other fact which may be
judicially noticed by the courts of this State. The parties must be
informed of any information, matters or facts so noticed, and must
be given a reasonable opportunity, on request, to refute such
information, matters or facts by evidence or by written or oral
presentation of authorities, the manner of such refutation to be
determined by the [Board.] hearing officer.
3. Affidavits may be received in evidence at any hearing [of
the Board] before a hearing officer in accordance with the
following:
(a) The party wishing to use an affidavit must, not less than 10
days before the day set for hearing, serve upon the opposing party or
counsel, either personally or by registered or certified mail, a copy
of the affidavit which the party proposes to introduce in evidence
together with a notice as provided in paragraph (c).
(b) Unless the opposing party, within 7 days after such service,
mails or delivers to the proponent a request to cross-examine the
affiant, the opposing party’s right to cross-examine the affiant is
waived and the affidavit, if introduced in evidence, must be given
the same effect as if the affiant had testified orally. If an opportunity
to cross-examine an affiant is not afforded after request therefor is
made in accordance with this paragraph, the affidavit may be
introduced in evidence, but must be given only the same effect as
other hearsay evidence.
(c) The notice referred to in paragraph (a) must be substantially
in the following form:
The accompanying affidavit of (here insert name of
affiant) will be introduced as evidence at the hearing set for
the ........ day of the month of ………. of the year …… (Here
insert name of affiant) will not be called to testify orally and
you will not be entitled to question (here insert name of
affiant) unless you notify the undersigned that you wish to
cross-examine (here insert name of affiant). To be effective
your request must be mailed or delivered to the undersigned
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
on or before 7 days from the date this notice and the enclosed
affidavit are served upon you.
................................................................
(Party or Counsel)
................................................................
(Address)
Sec. 18. NRS 678A.550 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678A.550 [The following procedures apply at] At all hearings
[of the Board:
1. At least three members of the Board shall be present at every
hearing, and they shall exercise all powers relating to the conduct
of] before a hearing officer, the hearing [and shall enforce all
decisions with respect thereto.
2. The proceedings] officer shall cause an audio recording to
be made of all oral proceedings at the hearing . The audio
recording must be [reported either stenographically or by a
phonographic reporter.] transcribed upon the request of any party.
The party making the request shall pay all the costs for the
transcription.
Sec. 19. NRS 678A.570 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678A.570 [The Board] A hearing officer may, before
submission of the case for decision, permit the filing of amended or
supplemental pleadings and shall notify all parties thereof, and
provide a reasonable opportunity for objections thereto.
Sec. 20. NRS 678A.580 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678A.580 If any person in proceedings before a hearing
officer or the Board disobeys or resists any lawful order or refuses
to respond to a subpoena, or refuses to take the oath or affirmation
as a witness or thereafter refuses to be examined, or is guilty of
misconduct during the hearing or so near the place thereof as to
obstruct the proceeding, the hearing officer or the Board may
certify the facts to the district court in and for the county where the
proceedings are held. The court shall thereupon issue an order
directing the person to appear before the court and show cause why
the person should not be punished as for contempt. The court order
and a copy of the statement of the hearing officer or the Board must
be served on the person cited to appear. Thereafter the court has
jurisdiction of the matter, and the same proceedings must be had, the
same penalties may be imposed and the person charged may purge
himself or herself of the contempt in the same way as in the case of
a person who has committed a contempt in the trial of a civil action
before a district court.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
Sec. 21. NRS 678A.590 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678A.590 1. Within 60 days after the hearing of a contested
matter, the [Board] hearing officer shall render a written decision
on the merits. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5 of NRS
233B.121, the written decision must contain findings of fact and
conclusions of law which are separately stated, a determination of
the issues presented and the penalty to be imposed, if any. If the
[Board] hearing officer determines that the licensee or registrant
has violated any provision of this title or any regulation adopted
pursuant thereto, the written decision must set forth the
determination of the [Board] hearing officer as to whether any of
the mitigating circumstances required to be considered by the
[Board] hearing officer pursuant to NRS 678A.600 exist and, if so,
the weight given to each mitigating circumstance in determining the
appropriate action to be taken pursuant to that section. The [Board]
hearing officer shall thereafter make and enter [its] a written order
in conformity to [its] the decision. [No member of the Board who
did not hear the evidence may vote on the decision. The affirmative
votes of a majority of the whole Board are required to impose any
penalty.] Copies of the decision and order must be served on the
parties personally or sent to them by [registered or] certified mail.
The decision is effective upon such service . [, unless the Board
orders otherwise.]
2. The [Board] hearing officer may, upon motion made within
15 days after service of a decision and order, order a rehearing
before the [Board] hearing officer upon such terms and conditions
as it may deem just and proper if a [petition for judicial] review of
the decision [and order] has not been [filed.] initiated pursuant to
section 6 of this act. The motion must not be granted except upon a
showing that there is additional evidence which is material and
necessary and reasonably calculated to change the decision of the
[Board,] hearing officer, and that sufficient reason existed for
failure to present the evidence at the hearing [of] before the [Board.]
hearing officer. The motion must be supported by an affidavit of
the moving party or his or her counsel showing with particularity the
materiality and necessity of the additional evidence and the reason
why it was not introduced at the hearing. Upon rehearing, rebuttal
evidence to the additional evidence must be permitted. After
rehearing, the [Board] hearing officer may modify [its] his or her
decision and order as the additional evidence may warrant.
Sec. 22. NRS 678A.600 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678A.600 1. If the [Board] hearing officer finds that a
licensee or registrant has violated a provision of this title or any
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 20 –
regulation adopted pursuant thereto, the [Board] hearing officer
may:
(a) Limit, condition, suspend or revoke the license or
registration card of the licensee or registrant;
(b) Impose a civil penalty in an amount established by
regulation, not to exceed $20,000 for a single violation;
(c) Take any combination of the actions authorized by
paragraphs (a) and (b);
(d) Issue a warning to the licensee or registrant; or
(e) Take no action against the licensee or registrant.
2. In determining the appropriate action to be taken against a
licensee or registrant pursuant to this section, including, without
limitation, the amount of any civil penalty imposed, the [Board]
hearing officer shall consider whether any of the mitigating
circumstances set forth in NRS 678A.647 exist.
Sec. 23. NRS 678A.610 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678A.610 Any person aggrieved by a final decision or order of
the Board made [after hearing or rehearing by the Board pursuant to
NRS 678A.520 to 678A.600, inclusive, and whether or not a motion
for rehearing was filed,] pursuant to section 6 of this act is entitled
to judicial review of the decision or order in the manner provided by
chapter 233B of NRS.
Sec. 24. NRS 678A.647 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678A.647 1. A violation of any provision of this title or any
regulation adopted pursuant thereto may be mitigated by any of the
following circumstances:
(a) The licensee or registrant self-reported the violation to the
Board or an agent of the Board.
(b) For a violation committed by a licensee, the licensee has:
(1) Submitted to the Board a plan to correct the violation
which has been approved by the Board or deemed approved
pursuant to subsection 2; and
(2) Taken action to correct the violation.
(c) The licensee or registrant has made a good faith effort to
prevent violations from occurring, including, without limitation, by:
(1) Providing regular training to the employees of the
licensee or registrant which has been documented and which was
provided before the commencement of an investigation by the
[Board] Executive Director concerning the violation [;] pursuant to
NRS 678A.500; or
(2) Establishing, before the commencement of an
investigation by the [Board] Executive Director concerning the
violation [,] pursuant to NRS 678A.500, standard operating
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 21 –
procedures that include procedures which directly address the
conduct constituting the violation.
(d) The licensee or registrant has cooperated in the investigation
of the violation in such a manner as to demonstrate that the licensee
or registrant accepts responsibility for the violation.
(e) Any other mitigating circumstance established by the Board
by regulation exists.
2. For the purposes of subparagraph (1) of paragraph (b) of
subsection 1, if a licensee has submitted a plan to correct a violation
and the Board does not take action to approve or reject the plan
within 30 days after the date on which the plan was submitted, the
plan shall be deemed to be approved by the appropriate agent of the
Board.
Sec. 25. Chapter 678B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 26 to 30, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 26. 1. If the Board, the Executive Director or a
designee of the Executive Director has reason to believe that a
licensee or registrant has violated or is violating any provision of
this title or the regulations adopted pursuant thereto, the Board,
Executive Director or designee may issue to the person a letter of
warning, a letter of concern or a nonpunitive admonishment at
any time before the Board has initiated any disciplinary
proceedings against the person.
2. The issuance of such a letter or admonishment:
(a) Does not preclude the Board from initiating any
disciplinary proceedings against the person or taking any
disciplinary action against the person based on any conduct
alleged or described in the letter or admonishment or any other
conduct; and
(b) Does not constitute a final decision of the Board and is not
subject to judicial review.
Sec. 27. 1. Each cannabis establishment, in consultation
with the Board, shall maintain an inventory control system.
2. The inventory control system required pursuant to
subsection 1 must be able to monitor and report information,
including, without limitation:
(a) Insofar as is practicable, the chain of custody and current
whereabouts, in real time, of cannabis from the point of
acquisition at a cannabis cultivation facility until it is sold at a
cannabis establishment;
(b) The name of each person or cannabis establishment, or
both, to which the cannabis establishment sold cannabis;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 22 –
(c) The date on which the cannabis was sold and the quantity
of any cannabis products sold, measured both by weight and
potency; and
(d) Such other information as the Board may require.
3. Nothing in this section prohibits more than one cannabis
establishment from co-owning an inventory control system in
cooperation with other cannabis establishments or sharing the
information obtained therefrom.
4. A cannabis establishment shall exercise reasonable care to
ensure that the personal identifying information of persons which
is contained in an inventory control system is encrypted, protected
and not divulged for any purpose not specifically authorized by
law.
Sec. 28. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 29. 1. The Board shall adopt regulations establishing:
(a) Procedures pursuant to which a cannabis establishment
must immediately discontinue operations and notify the Board
upon becoming aware that a condition constituting a substantial
hazard to the public health exists at the cannabis establishment.
Such procedures must not require a cannabis establishment at
which a substantial hazard to the public health exists to
discontinue operations if the hazard affects a discrete area of the
cannabis establishment and the Board has approved a plan to
allow the cannabis establishment to continue operations in the
areas of the cannabis establishment unaffected by the hazard.
(b) Procedures and requirements for a cannabis establishment
to resume operations after a substantial hazard to the public
health has been found to exist at the cannabis establishment.
2. As used in this section, “substantial hazard to the public
health” means any of the following:
(a) A fire or flood.
(b) Interruption of electrical service for more than 2 hours.
(c) Interruption of water service.
(d) Sewage backup.
(e) The misuse of poisonous or toxic materials.
(f) The onset of an apparent food-borne illness outbreak.
(g) A gross insanitary occurrence or condition.
(h) Any other occurrence or condition that may endanger the
public health.
Sec. 30. 1. Whenever an agent of the Board finds a
condition in the operation of a cannabis establishment which
constitutes a substantial hazard to the public health as defined in
section 29 of this act, the agent may, without warning, notice or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 23 –
hearing, issue a written order to the licensee citing the condition,
specifying the corrective action to be taken and specifying the time
within which the action must be taken. Except as otherwise
provided in subsection 3, the order may state that the license of the
cannabis establishment is immediately suspended and all
operations must be immediately discontinued. Any person to
whom such an order is issued shall comply with it immediately.
Upon written petition to the Board, the person must be afforded a
hearing before a hearing officer as soon as possible, but not later
than 14 days after the date on which the order was issued unless
the Board and the licensee agree in writing to a longer period.
2. Any licensee whose license has been suspended pursuant
to subsection 1 may, at any time, make an application for a
reinspection for reinstatement of the license. As soon as
practicable, but not more than 2 business days following receipt of
a written request, including a statement signed by the applicant
that in the opinion of the applicant the conditions causing the
suspension of the license have been corrected, the Board shall
make a reinspection. If the applicant is complying with all
applicable requirements of this title and the regulations adopted
pursuant thereto, the license must be reinstated.
3. An order issued by an agent of the Board pursuant to
subsection 1 must not order the immediate suspension of the
license for the cannabis establishment and the immediate
discontinuance of the operations of the cannabis establishment if
the Board has approved the continued operation of the cannabis
establishment or, while the agent of the Board is on the premises
of the cannabis establishment:
(a) The condition is immediately corrected; or
(b) The licensee presents to the agent of the Board a plan for
the continued operation of the cannabis establishment and the
agent of the Board approves the plan.
Sec. 31. NRS 678B.060 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678B.060 “Inventory control system” means a process, device
or other contrivance that may be used to monitor the chain of
custody of cannabis from the point of [cultivation] acquisition to the
end consumer.
Sec. 32. NRS 678B.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678B.210 1. A person shall not engage in the business of a
medical cannabis establishment unless the person holds a medical
cannabis establishment license issued by the Board pursuant to this
section.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 24 –
2. A person who wishes to engage in the business of a medical
cannabis establishment must submit to the Board an application on a
form prescribed by the Board.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 678B.215 to
678B.240, inclusive, not later than 90 days after receiving an
application to engage in the business of a medical cannabis
establishment, the Board shall register the medical cannabis
establishment and issue a medical cannabis establishment license
and a random 20-digit alphanumeric identification number if:
(a) The person who wishes to operate the proposed medical
cannabis establishment has submitted to the Board all of the
following:
(1) The application fee, as set forth in NRS 678B.390;
(2) An application, which must include:
(I) The legal name of the proposed medical cannabis
establishment;
(II) The physical address where the proposed medical
cannabis establishment will be located and the physical address of
any co-owned additional or otherwise associated medical cannabis
establishments, the locations of which may not be on the property of
an airport, within 1,000 feet of a public or private school that
provides formal education traditionally associated with preschool or
kindergarten through grade 12 and that existed on the date on which
the application for the proposed medical cannabis establishment was
submitted to the Board, within 300 feet of a community facility that
existed on the date on which the application for the proposed
medical cannabis establishment was submitted to the Board or, if the
proposed medical cannabis establishment will be located in a county
whose population is 100,000 or more, within 1,500 feet of an
establishment that holds a nonrestricted gaming license described in
subsection 1 or 2 of NRS 463.0177 and that existed on the date on
which the application for the proposed medical cannabis
establishment was submitted to the Board;
(III) Evidence that the applicant controls not less than
$250,000 in liquid assets to cover the initial expenses of opening the
proposed medical cannabis establishment and complying with the
provisions of this title;
(IV) Evidence that the applicant owns the property on
which the proposed medical cannabis establishment will be located
or has the written permission of the property owner to operate the
proposed medical cannabis establishment on that property;
(V) For the applicant and each person who is proposed to
be an owner, officer or board member of the proposed medical
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 25 –
cannabis establishment, a complete set of the person’s fingerprints
and written permission of the person authorizing the Board to
forward the fingerprints to the Central Repository for Nevada
Records of Criminal History for submission to the Federal Bureau
of Investigation for its report; and
(VI) The name, address and date of birth of each person
who is proposed to be an owner, officer or board member of the
proposed medical cannabis establishment;
(3) Operating procedures consistent with rules of the Board
for oversight of the proposed medical cannabis establishment,
including, without limitation:
(I) Procedures to ensure the use of adequate security
measures; and
(II) The use of an electronic verification and
authentication system and an inventory control system pursuant to
NRS 678C.420 and [678C.430;] section 27 of this act;
(4) If the proposed medical cannabis establishment will sell
or deliver medical cannabis products, proposed operating
procedures for handling such products which must be preapproved
by the Board;
(5) If the city or county in which the proposed medical
cannabis establishment will be located has enacted zoning
restrictions, proof that the proposed location is in compliance with
those restrictions and satisfies all applicable building requirements;
and
(6) Such other information as the Board may require by
regulation;
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 678B.633, none of the
persons who are proposed to be owners, officers or board members
of the proposed medical cannabis establishment have been
convicted of an excluded felony offense;
(c) None of the persons who are proposed to be owners, officers
or board members of the proposed medical cannabis establishment
have:
(1) Served as an owner, officer or board member for a
cannabis establishment that has had its medical cannabis
establishment license or adult-use cannabis establishment license
revoked;
(2) Previously had a cannabis establishment agent
registration card revoked;
(3) Previously had a cannabis establishment agent
registration card for a cannabis executive revoked; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 26 –
(4) Previously had a cannabis establishment agent
registration card for a cannabis receiver revoked; and
(d) None of the persons who are proposed to be owners, officers
or board members of the proposed medical cannabis establishment
are under 21 years of age.
4. For each person who submits an application pursuant to this
section, and each person who is proposed to be an owner, officer or
board member of a proposed medical cannabis establishment, the
Board shall submit the fingerprints of the person to the Central
Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History for submission
to the Federal Bureau of Investigation to determine the criminal
history of that person.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6 and NRS
678B.215, if an application for registration as a medical cannabis
establishment satisfies the requirements of this section, is qualified
in the determination of the Board pursuant to NRS 678B.200 and
the establishment is not disqualified from being registered as a
medical cannabis establishment pursuant to this section or other
applicable law, the Board shall issue to the establishment a medical
cannabis establishment license. A medical cannabis establishment
license expires 1 year after the date of issuance and may be renewed
upon:
(a) Submission of the information required by the Board by
regulation; and
(b) Payment of the renewal fee set forth in NRS 678B.390.
6. In determining whether to issue a medical cannabis
establishment license pursuant to this section, the Board shall
consider the criteria of merit set forth in NRS 678B.240.
7. For the purposes of sub-subparagraph (II) of subparagraph
(2) of paragraph (a) of subsection 3, the distance must be measured
from the front door of the proposed medical cannabis establishment
to the closest point of the property line of a school, community
facility or gaming establishment.
8. As used in this section [, “community] :
(a) “Community facility” means:
[(a)] (1) A [facility that provides day care to children.] licensed
child care facility, as defined in NRS 432A.024.
[(b)] (2) A public park.
[(c)] (3) A playground [.] , as defined in NRS 453.3345.
[(d)] (4) A public swimming pool [.] , as defined in
NRS 444.065.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 27 –
[(e)] (5) A [center or facility, the primary purpose of which is to
provide] recreational [opportunities or services to children or
adolescents.] center for youths.
[(f)] (6) A [church, synagogue or other building, structure or
place used for] video arcade, as defined in NRS 453.3345.
(7) A place of religious worship . [or other religious
purpose.]
(b) “Place of religious worship” means a church, synagogue
or other building or structure that is owned and operated by a
church, an integrated auxiliary of a church or a convention or
association of churches that is exempt for taxation pursuant to
section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. §
501(c)(3), and exempt from filing an annual return pursuant to
section 6033 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 6033. The
term does not include any building, structure or other place that is
owned and operated by an organization that is listed on the most
recent version of the Automatic Revocation of Exemption List
published by the Internal Revenue Service, regardless of whether
the organization identifies as a church, an integrated auxiliary of
a church or a convention or association of churches.
(c) “Private school” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 394.103.
(d) “Public school” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 385.007.
(e) “Recreational center for youths” means a recreational
facility or gymnasium which regularly provides athletic, civic or
cultural activities in which more than 75 percent of the
participants are persons who are less than 18 years of age.
Sec. 33. NRS 678B.215 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678B.215 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
Board shall not, on or after January 1, 2024, issue any additional
medical cannabis establishment licenses or renew a medical
cannabis establishment license pursuant to NRS 678B.210.
2. The Board may, on or after January 1, 2024:
(a) Issue a medical cannabis establishment license to an
applicant pursuant to NRS 678B.210 if the proposed medical
cannabis establishment will be located in a local governmental
jurisdiction that is a covered jurisdiction.
(b) Renew the medical cannabis establishment license of a
medical cannabis establishment pursuant to NRS 678B.210 so long
as the local governmental jurisdiction in which the medical cannabis
establishment is located is a covered jurisdiction.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 28 –
3. If a local governmental jurisdiction that is a covered
jurisdiction ceases to be a covered jurisdiction, a person who holds a
medical cannabis establishment license for a medical cannabis
establishment located in the local governmental jurisdiction may,
upon expiration of the license, submit an application to the Board
for the issuance of an adult-use cannabis establishment license of
the same type.
4. An application submitted pursuant to subsection 3 must:
(a) Contain the same information as required for the renewal of
a medical cannabis establishment license pursuant to NRS
678B.210; and
(b) Be accompanied by a fee in an amount that is equal to the
fee for the renewal of an adult-use cannabis establishment license of
the same type as that of the medical cannabis establishment license
which has expired, as set forth in NRS 678B.390.
5. If the Board determines that the applicant would have been
eligible to renew the medical cannabis establishment license which
has expired, the Board shall issue to the applicant an adult-use
cannabis establishment license of the same type.
6. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, an adult-use
cannabis establishment license issued by the Board pursuant to this
section shall be deemed to be an adult-use cannabis establishment
license issued by the Board pursuant to NRS 678B.250.
7. An adult-use cannabis establishment license issued by the
Board pursuant to this section shall be deemed to be a medical
cannabis establishment license of the same type for the purposes of
NRS 678B.220, 678B.230, 678B.260 and 678B.270.
8. As used in this section [:
(a) “Covered] , “covered jurisdiction” means a local
governmental jurisdiction that has adopted local cannabis control
measures which prohibit the operation of adult-use cannabis
establishments in the local governmental jurisdiction.
[(b) “Local governmental jurisdiction” means a city or
unincorporated area within a county.]
Sec. 34. NRS 678B.230 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678B.230 1. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
in a county whose population is 100,000 or more, the Board shall
ensure that not more than 25 percent of the total number of medical
cannabis dispensaries that may be licensed in the county, as set forth
in NRS 678B.220, are located in any one local governmental
jurisdiction within the county. The Board may increase the
percentage described in this subsection upon the request of the
board of county commissioners of the county. The Board shall adopt
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 29 –
regulations setting forth the requirements for granting such a
request.
2. To prevent monopolistic practices, the Board shall ensure, in
a county whose population is 100,000 or more, that it does not issue,
to any one person, group of persons or entity, the greater of:
(a) One medical cannabis establishment license; or
(b) More than 10 percent of the medical cannabis establishment
licenses otherwise allocable in the county.
[3. As used in this section, “local governmental jurisdiction”
means a city or unincorporated area within a county.]
Sec. 35. NRS 678B.250 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678B.250 1. A person shall not engage in the business of an
adult-use cannabis establishment unless the person holds an adult-
use cannabis establishment license issued pursuant to this section.
2. A person who wishes to engage in the business of an adult-
use cannabis establishment must submit to the Board an application
on a form prescribed by the Board.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 678B.260, 678B.270,
678B.280, 678B.322 and 678B.324 to 678B.328, inclusive, the
Board shall issue an adult-use cannabis establishment license to an
applicant if:
(a) The person who wishes to operate the proposed adult-use
cannabis establishment has submitted to the Board all of the
following:
(1) The application fee, as set forth in NRS 678B.390;
(2) An application, which must include:
(I) The legal name of the proposed adult-use cannabis
establishment;
(II) The physical address where the proposed adult-use
cannabis establishment will be located and the physical address of
any co-owned additional or otherwise associated adult-use cannabis
establishments, the locations of which may not be on the property of
an airport, within 1,000 feet of a public or private school that
provides formal education traditionally associated with preschool or
kindergarten through grade 12 and that existed on the date on which
the application for the proposed adult-use cannabis establishment
was submitted to the Board, within 300 feet of a community facility
that existed on the date on which the application for the proposed
adult-use cannabis establishment was submitted to the Board or, if
the proposed adult-use cannabis establishment will be located in a
county whose population is 100,000 or more, within 1,500 feet of an
establishment that holds a nonrestricted gaming license described in
subsection 1 or 2 of NRS 463.0177 and that existed on the date on
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 30 –
which the application for the proposed adult-use cannabis
establishment was submitted to the Board;
(III) Evidence that the applicant controls liquid assets in
an amount determined by the Board to be sufficient to cover the
initial expenses of opening the proposed adult-use cannabis
establishment and complying with the provisions of this title;
(IV) Evidence that the applicant owns the property on
which the proposed adult-use cannabis establishment will be located
or has the written permission of the property owner to operate the
proposed adult-use cannabis establishment on that property;
(V) For the applicant and each person who is proposed to
be an owner, officer or board member of the proposed adult-use
cannabis establishment, a complete set of the person’s fingerprints
and written permission of the person authorizing the Board to
forward the fingerprints to the Central Repository for Nevada
Records of Criminal History for submission to the Federal Bureau
of Investigation for its report; and
(VI) The name, address and date of birth of each person
who is proposed to be an owner, officer or board member of the
proposed adult-use cannabis establishment;
(3) Operating procedures consistent with rules of the Board
for oversight of the proposed adult-use cannabis establishment,
including, without limitation:
(I) Procedures to ensure the use of adequate security
measures; and
(II) The use of an inventory control system [;] pursuant
to section 27 of this act;
(4) If the proposed adult-use cannabis establishment will sell
or deliver adult-use cannabis products, proposed operating
procedures for handling such products which must be preapproved
by the Board; and
(5) Such other information as the Board may require by
regulation;
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 678B.633, none of the
persons who are proposed to be owners, officers or board members
of the proposed adult-use cannabis establishment have been
convicted of an excluded felony offense;
(c) None of the persons who are proposed to be owners, officers
or board members of the proposed adult-use cannabis establishment
have:
(1) Served as an owner, officer or board member for a
cannabis establishment that has had its adult-use cannabis
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 31 –
establishment license or medical cannabis establishment license
revoked;
(2) Previously had a cannabis establishment agent
registration card revoked;
(3) Previously had a cannabis establishment agent
registration card for a cannabis executive revoked; or
(4) Previously had a cannabis establishment agent
registration card for a cannabis receiver revoked; and
(d) None of the persons who are proposed to be owners, officers
or board members of the proposed adult-use cannabis establishment
are under 21 years of age.
4. For each person who submits an application pursuant to this
section, and each person who is proposed to be an owner, officer or
board member of a proposed adult-use cannabis establishment, the
Board shall submit the fingerprints of the person to the Central
Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History for submission
to the Federal Bureau of Investigation to determine the criminal
history of that person.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, if an applicant
for licensure to operate an adult-use cannabis establishment satisfies
the requirements of this section, is qualified in the determination of
the Board pursuant to NRS 678B.200 and is not disqualified from
being licensed pursuant to this section or other applicable law, the
Board shall issue to the applicant an adult-use cannabis
establishment license. An adult-use cannabis establishment license
expires 1 year after the date of issuance and may be renewed upon:
(a) Submission of the information required by the Board by
regulation; and
(b) Payment of the renewal fee set forth in NRS 678B.390.
6. In determining whether to issue an adult-use cannabis
license pursuant to this section, the Board shall consider the criteria
of merit and scoring guidelines set forth in NRS 678B.280 or
678B.324, as applicable.
7. For the purposes of sub-subparagraph (II) of subparagraph
(2) of paragraph (a) of subsection 3, the distance must be measured
from the front door of the proposed adult-use cannabis
establishment to the closest point of the property line of a school,
community facility or gaming establishment.
8. As used in this section [, “community] :
(a) “Community facility” [means:
(a) A facility that provides day care to children.
(b) A public park.
(c) A playground.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 32 –
(d) A public swimming pool.
(e) A center or facility, the primary purpose of which is to
provide recreational opportunities or services to children or
adolescents.
(f) A church, synagogue or other building, structure or place
used for religious worship or other religious purpose.] has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 678B.210.
(b) “Private school” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 394.103.
(c) “Public school” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 385.007.
Sec. 36. NRS 678B.290 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678B.290 1. The Board shall establish standards for [and
certify one or more] cannabis independent testing laboratories to:
(a) Test cannabis for adult use and adult-use cannabis products
that are to be sold in this State;
(b) Test cannabis for medical use and medical cannabis products
that are to be sold in this State; and
(c) In addition to the testing described in paragraph (a) or (b),
test commodities or products containing hemp, as defined in NRS
557.160, or cannabidiol which are intended for human or animal
consumption and sold by a cannabis establishment or a person
described in NRS 446.844.
2. Such a cannabis independent testing laboratory must be able
to:
(a) Determine accurately, with respect to cannabis or cannabis
products that are sold or will be sold at cannabis sales facilities in
this State:
(1) The concentration therein of THC and cannabidiol.
(2) The presence and identification of microbes, molds and
fungi.
(3) The composition of the tested material.
(4) The presence of chemicals in the tested material,
including, without limitation, pesticides, heavy metals, herbicides or
growth regulators.
(5) The presence of any other substance, chemical, material
or organism required by the Board by regulation.
(b) Demonstrate the validity and accuracy of the methods used
by the cannabis independent testing laboratory to test cannabis and
cannabis products.
3. To obtain a license to operate a cannabis independent testing
laboratory, an applicant must:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 33 –
(a) Apply successfully as required pursuant to NRS 678B.210 or
678B.250, as applicable.
(b) Pay the fees required pursuant to NRS 678B.390.
(c) [Agree to] Satisfy any other requirements established by the
Board by regulation.
4. A cannabis independent testing laboratory shall, not more
than 1 year after the date on which the cannabis independent
testing laboratory is issued a license by the Board pursuant to
NRS 678B.210 or 678B.250, become accredited pursuant to
standard ISO/IEC 17025 of the International Organization for
Standardization [within 1 year after licensure] by an impartial
organization that operates in accordance with standard ISO/IEC
17011 of the International Organization for Standardization and is a
signatory to the Mutual Recognition Arrangement of the
International Laboratory Accreditation Cooperation.
5. The Board may adopt regulations establishing standards
and procedures for the operation of a cannabis independent
testing laboratory, including, without limitation, regulations
setting forth requirements concerning:
(a) The construction or layout of a building used for testing
cannabis and cannabis products;
(b) The procedures, process, equipment, instruments, materials
or supplies used for testing cannabis and cannabis products;
(c) Safety procedures to ensure that cannabis and cannabis
products are protected from contamination from physical,
chemical or biological hazardous materials; and
(d) The creation and retention of records by a cannabis
independent testing laboratory, including, without limitation,
records related to the finances of the cannabis independent testing
laboratory and testing performed by the cannabis independent
testing laboratory.
Sec. 37. NRS 678B.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678B.320 1. In a local governmental jurisdiction that issues
business licenses, the issuance by the Board of a license shall be
deemed to be conditional until such time as:
(a) The cannabis establishment is in compliance with all
applicable local governmental ordinances or rules; [and]
(b) The local government has issued a business license for the
operation of the cannabis establishment [.] ; and
(c) The cannabis establishment satisfies an inspection
conducted by the Board.
2. The Board shall adopt regulations:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 34 –
(a) Requiring the surrender of a conditional license if a cannabis
establishment does not satisfy the requirements of subsection 1
within a period of time determined by the Board; and
(b) Authorizing a cannabis establishment to request an extension
of the period of time established pursuant to paragraph (a) as a result
of factors outside of the control of the cannabis establishment that
cause a delay in satisfying the requirements of subsection 1.
[3. As used in this section, “local governmental jurisdiction”
means a city or unincorporated area within a county.]
Sec. 38. NRS 678B.327 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678B.327 1. The Board shall, for each local governmental
jurisdiction that limits the number of business licenses which may
be issued to cannabis consumption lounges, determine the number
of licenses allocated to the jurisdiction for retail cannabis
consumption lounges and independent cannabis consumption
lounges.
2. Not more than 50 percent of the licenses allocated by the
Board pursuant to subsection 1 may be issued to retail cannabis
consumption lounges.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, at least 50
percent of the licenses allocated to a local governmental jurisdiction
pursuant to subsection 1 must be issued to independent cannabis
consumption lounges. At least 50 percent of the licenses issued to
independent cannabis consumption lounges must be issued to social
equity applicants. If there are an insufficient number of social equity
applicants to distribute licenses in that manner, the local
governmental jurisdiction shall issue business licenses to all
qualified social equity applicants and hold the remaining business
licenses in reserve for future issuance to social equity applicants.
4. If the number of qualified applicants in a local governmental
jurisdiction exceeds the number of licenses allocated to that
jurisdiction pursuant to subsection 1, the Board shall issue adult-use
cannabis establishment licenses for retail cannabis consumption
lounges and independent cannabis consumption lounges in the local
governmental jurisdiction to qualified applicants who are not social
equity applicants using a separate lottery system for each type of
license.
[5. As used in this section, “local governmental jurisdiction”
means a city or unincorporated area within a county.]
Sec. 39. NRS 678B.510 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678B.510 1. The operating documents of a cannabis
establishment must include procedures:
(a) For the oversight of the cannabis establishment; [and]
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 35 –
(b) To ensure accurate recordkeeping [.] ;
(c) For the training of the cannabis establishment agents who
volunteer or work at, contract to provide labor to or are employed
by an independent contractor to provide labor to the cannabis
establishment; and
(d) Any other procedures for the operation of the cannabis
establishment established by the Board by regulation.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a cannabis
establishment may have more than one entrance so long as each
entrance is secure and shall implement strict security measures to
deter and prevent the theft of cannabis and unauthorized entrance
into areas containing cannabis. The provisions of this subsection do
not supersede any state or local requirements relating to minimum
numbers of points of entry or exit, or any state or local requirements
relating to fire safety.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 678D.400, all
cultivation or production of cannabis that a cannabis cultivation
facility carries out or causes to be carried out must take place in an
enclosed, locked facility at the physical address provided to the
Board during the licensing process for the cannabis cultivation
facility. Such an enclosed, locked facility must be accessible only by
cannabis establishment agents who are lawfully associated with the
cannabis cultivation facility, except that limited access by persons
necessary to perform construction or repairs or provide other labor
is permissible if such persons are supervised by a cannabis
establishment agent.
4. A cannabis establishment that is not a cannabis consumption
lounge shall not allow any person to consume cannabis on the
property or premises of the establishment.
5. Cannabis establishments are subject to [reasonable]
inspection by the Board at any time, and a person who holds a
license must make himself or herself, or a designee thereof,
available and present for any inspection by the Board of the
cannabis establishment.
6. Each cannabis establishment shall install a video monitoring
system which must, at a minimum:
(a) Allow for the transmission and storage, by digital or analog
means, of a video feed which displays the interior and exterior of the
cannabis establishment; [and]
(b) Be capable of being accessed remotely by a law enforcement
agency in real-time upon request [.] ; and
(c) Satisfy any other requirements established by the Board by
regulation.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 36 –
7. A cannabis establishment shall not dispense or otherwise sell
cannabis or cannabis products from a vending machine or allow
such a vending machine to be installed at the interior or exterior of
the premises of the cannabis establishment. As used in this
subsection, “vending machine” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 209.229.
Sec. 40. NRS 678B.520 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678B.520 1. Each cannabis establishment shall, in
consultation with the Board, cooperate to ensure that all cannabis
products offered for sale:
(a) Are labeled clearly and unambiguously:
(1) As cannabis with the words “THIS PRODUCT
CONTAINS CANNABIS” in bold type; and
(2) As required by the provisions of this chapter , [and]
chapters 678C and 678D of NRS [.] and the regulations adopted by
the Board.
(b) Are not presented in packaging that contains an
anthropomorphic image or an image of a cartoon character,
mascot, action figure, balloon or toy, except that such an item may
appear in the logo of the cannabis production facility which
produced the product.
(c) Are regulated and sold on the basis of the concentration of
THC in the products and not by weight.
(d) Are packaged and labeled in such a manner as to allow
tracking by way of an inventory control system.
(e) Are not packaged and labeled in a manner which is modeled
after a brand of products primarily consumed by or marketed to
children.
(f) Are labeled in a manner which indicates the amount of THC
in the product, measured in milligrams, and includes a statement
that the product contains cannabis and its potency was tested with an
allowable variance of the amount determined by the Board by
regulation.
(g) Are not labeled or marketed as candy.
(h) Are labeled with:
(1) The words “Keep out of reach of children”;
(2) A list of all ingredients used in the cannabis product;
(3) A list of all major food allergens in the cannabis product;
and
(4) Any other information the Board may require by
regulation.
2. A cannabis production facility shall not produce cannabis
products in any form that:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 37 –
(a) Is or appears to be a lollipop.
(b) Bears the likeness or contains characteristics of a real or
fictional person, animal or fruit, including, without limitation, a
caricature, cartoon or artistic rendering.
(c) Contains an anthropomorphic image.
(d) Is modeled after a brand of products primarily consumed by
or marketed to children.
[(d)] (e) Is made by applying concentrated cannabis, as defined
in NRS 453.042, to a commercially available candy or snack food
item other than dried fruit, nuts or granola.
3. A cannabis production facility shall:
(a) Seal any cannabis product that consists of cookies or
brownies in a bag or other container which is not transparent.
(b) Maintain a hand washing area with hot water, soap and
disposable towels which is located away from any area in which
cannabis products are cooked or otherwise prepared.
(c) Require each person who handles cannabis products to
restrain his or her hair, wear clean clothing and keep his or her
fingernails neatly trimmed.
(d) Package all cannabis products produced by the cannabis
production facility on the premises of the cannabis production
facility.
4. A cannabis establishment shall not engage in advertising that
in any way makes cannabis or cannabis products appeal to children,
including, without limitation, advertising which uses an
anthropomorphic image or an image of a cartoon character,
mascot, action figure, balloon, fruit or toy.
5. Each cannabis sales facility shall offer for sale containers for
the storage of cannabis and cannabis products which lock and are
designed to prohibit children from unlocking and opening the
container.
6. A cannabis sales facility shall:
(a) Convey to each purchaser of cannabis or cannabis products
the following information in a manner prescribed by the Board:
(1) To keep cannabis and cannabis products out of the reach
of children;
(2) That cannabis products can cause severe illness in
children;
(3) That allowing children to ingest cannabis or cannabis
products or storing cannabis or cannabis products in a location
which is accessible to children may result in an investigation by an
agency which provides child welfare services or criminal
prosecution for child abuse or neglect;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 38 –
(4) That the intoxicating effects of edible cannabis products
may be delayed by 2 hours or more and users of edible cannabis
products should initially ingest a small amount of the product, then
wait at least 120 minutes before ingesting any additional amount of
the product;
(5) That pregnant women should consult with a physician
before ingesting cannabis or cannabis products;
(6) That ingesting cannabis or cannabis products with
alcohol or other drugs, including prescription medication, may result
in unpredictable levels of impairment and that a person should
consult with a physician before doing so;
(7) That cannabis or cannabis products can impair
concentration, coordination and judgment and a person should not
operate a motor vehicle while under the influence of cannabis or
cannabis products; and
(8) That ingestion of any amount of cannabis or cannabis
products before driving may result in criminal prosecution for
driving under the influence.
(b) Enclose all cannabis and cannabis products in opaque, child-
resistant packaging upon sale.
7. A cannabis sales facility shall allow any person who is at
least 21 years of age to enter the premises of the cannabis sales
facility.
8. If the health authority, as defined in NRS 446.050, where a
cannabis production facility, cannabis sales facility or cannabis
consumption lounge which sells edible cannabis products is located
requires persons who handle food at a food establishment to obtain
certification, the cannabis production facility, cannabis sales facility
or cannabis consumption lounge shall ensure that at least one
employee maintains such certification.
9. A cannabis production facility may sell a commodity or
product made using hemp, as defined in NRS 557.160, or containing
cannabidiol to a cannabis sales facility.
10. In addition to any other product authorized by the
provisions of this title, a cannabis sales facility may sell:
(a) Any commodity or product made using hemp, as defined in
NRS 557.160;
(b) Any commodity or product containing cannabidiol with a
THC concentration of not more than 0.3 percent; and
(c) Any other product specified by regulation of the Board.
11. A cannabis establishment:
(a) Shall not engage in advertising which contains any statement
or illustration that:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 39 –
(1) Is false or misleading;
(2) Promotes overconsumption of cannabis or cannabis
products;
(3) Depicts the actual consumption of cannabis or cannabis
products; or
(4) Depicts a child or other person who is less than 21 years
of age consuming cannabis or cannabis products or objects
suggesting the presence of a child, including, without limitation,
toys, characters or cartoons, or contains any other depiction which is
designed in any manner to be appealing to or encourage
consumption of cannabis or cannabis products by a person who is
less than 21 years of age.
(b) Shall not advertise in any publication or on radio, television
or any other medium if 30 percent or more of the audience of that
medium is reasonably expected to be persons who are less than 21
years of age.
(c) Shall not place an advertisement:
(1) Within 1,000 feet of a public or private school,
playground, public park or library, but may maintain such an
advertisement if it was initially placed before the school,
playground, public park or library was located within 1,000 feet of
the location of the advertisement;
(2) On or inside of a motor vehicle used for public
transportation or any shelter for public transportation;
(3) At a sports event to which persons who are less than 21
years of age are allowed entry; or
(4) At an entertainment event if it is reasonably estimated
that 30 percent or more of the persons who will attend that event are
less than 21 years of age.
(d) Shall not advertise or offer any cannabis or cannabis product
as “free” or “donated” without a purchase.
(e) Shall ensure that all advertising by the cannabis
establishment contains such warnings as may be prescribed by the
Board, which must include, without limitation, the following words:
(1) “Keep out of reach of children”; and
(2) “For use only by adults 21 years of age and older.”
(f) Shall ensure that all advertising by the cannabis
establishment contains:
(1) The name of the cannabis establishment; and
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 12, the adult-
use cannabis establishment license number or medical cannabis
establishment license number of the cannabis establishment or any
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 40 –
other unique identifier assigned to the cannabis establishment by the
Board.
12. A cannabis establishment that holds more than one license
may satisfy the requirement set forth in subparagraph (2) of
paragraph (f) of subsection 11 if the cannabis establishment includes
in all advertising conducted by the cannabis establishment:
(a) Any one of the adult-use cannabis establishment license
numbers or medical cannabis establishment license numbers of the
cannabis establishment; or
(b) Any one unique identifier assigned to the cannabis
establishment by the Board.
13. Nothing in subsection 11 shall be construed to prohibit a
local government, pursuant to chapter 244, 268 or 278 of NRS, from
adopting an ordinance for the regulation of advertising relating to
cannabis which is more restrictive than the provisions of subsection
11 relating to:
(a) The number, location and size of signs, including, without
limitation, any signs carried or displayed by a natural person;
(b) Handbills, pamphlets, cards or other types of advertisements
that are distributed [,] to the general public, excluding an
advertisement placed in a newspaper of general circulation, trade
publication or other form of print media;
(c) Any stationary or moving display that is located on or near
the premises of a cannabis establishment; and
(d) The content of any advertisement used by a cannabis
establishment if the ordinance sets forth specific prohibited content
for such an advertisement.
14. If a cannabis establishment engages in advertising for
which it is required to determine the percentage of persons who are
less than 21 years of age and who may reasonably be expected to
view or hear the advertisement, the cannabis establishment shall
maintain documentation for not less than 5 years after the date on
which the advertisement is first broadcasted, published or otherwise
displayed that demonstrates the manner in which the cannabis
establishment determined the reasonably expected age of the
audience for that advertisement.
15. To the extent that they are inconsistent or otherwise
conflict with the regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to NRS
678D.480, the requirements of this section pertaining to cannabis
products do not apply to ready-to-consume cannabis products
prepared and sold by a cannabis consumption lounge.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 41 –
16. In addition to any other penalties provided for by law, the
Board may impose a civil penalty upon a cannabis establishment
that violates the provisions of subsection 11 or 14 as follows:
(a) For the first violation in the immediately preceding 2 years, a
civil penalty not to exceed $1,250.
(b) For the second violation in the immediately preceding 2
years, a civil penalty not to exceed $2,500.
(c) For the third violation in the immediately preceding 2 years,
a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000.
(d) For the fourth violation in the immediately preceding 2
years, a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000.
17. As used in this section [, “motor] :
(a) “Anthropomorphic image” means any image, including,
without limitation, a caricature, cartoon or artistic rendering, in
which human characteristics are attributed to an animal, plant or
other object or which uses similar anthropomorphic techniques.
(b) “Motor vehicle used for public transportation” does not
include a taxicab, as defined in NRS 706.124.
Sec. 41. NRS 678B.530 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678B.530 1. A person shall not:
(a) Advertise the sale of cannabis or cannabis products by the
person; [or]
(b) Sell, offer to sell or appear to sell cannabis or cannabis
products or allow the submission of an order for cannabis or
cannabis products [,] ; or
(c) Advertise as a cannabis sales facility or cannabis
consumption lounge,
 unless the person holds [an adult-use cannabis establishment
license or a medical cannabis establishment] the appropriate type of
license [.] which authorizes the person to sell cannabis or
cannabis products or engage in the business of a cannabis sales
facility or cannabis consumption lounge, as applicable.
2. A local government shall not regulate the content of an
advertisement for the sale of cannabis or cannabis products unless
the local government adopts an ordinance setting forth such
regulations.
Sec. 42. NRS 678B.600 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678B.600 1. An employee of the State Department of
Agriculture or the Board or an attorney who represents the
Department or Board who, in the course of his or her duties:
(a) Possesses, delivers or produces cannabis;
(b) Aids and abets another in the possession, delivery or
production of cannabis;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 42 –
(c) Performs any combination of the acts described in
paragraphs (a) and (b); or
(d) Performs any other criminal offense in which the possession,
delivery or production of cannabis is an element,
 is exempt from state prosecution for the offense. The persons
described in this subsection must ensure that the cannabis described
in this subsection is safeguarded in an enclosed, secure location.
2. In addition to the provisions of subsection 1, no person may
be subject to state prosecution for constructive possession,
conspiracy or any other criminal offense solely for being in the
presence or vicinity of the cannabis in accordance with the
provisions of this title.
3. As used in this section, “cannabis” includes, without
limitation, cannabis products.
Sec. 43. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 44. NRS 678C.420 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678C.420 1. Each medical cannabis establishment, in
consultation with the Board, shall maintain an electronic verification
and authentication system.
2. The electronic verification and authentication system
required pursuant to subsection 1 must be able to monitor and report
information, including, without limitation:
(a) In the case of a medical cannabis dispensary, for each person
who holds a valid registry identification card and who purchased
cannabis from the dispensary in the immediately preceding 60-day
period:
(1) The number of the card;
(2) The date on which the card was issued; and
(3) The date on which the card will expire.
(b) For each cannabis establishment agent who is employed by
or volunteers at the medical cannabis establishment, the number of
the person’s cannabis establishment agent registration card.
(c) In the case of a medical cannabis dispensary, such
information as may be required by the Board by regulation
regarding persons who are not residents of this State and who have
purchased cannabis from the dispensary [.] in the immediately
preceding 120-day period. Such information may include, without
limitation, any information relating to any document issued to a
person who is not a resident of this State by the state in which the
person is a resident which identifies the person as exempt from
state prosecution for engaging in the medical use of cannabis in
that state.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 43 –
(d) Verification of the identity of a person to whom cannabis or
medical cannabis products are sold or otherwise distributed.
(e) Such other information as the Board may require.
3. Nothing in this section prohibits more than one medical
cannabis establishment from co-owning an electronic verification
and authentication system in cooperation with other medical
cannabis establishments, or sharing the information obtained
therefrom.
4. A medical cannabis establishment must exercise reasonable
care to ensure that the personal identifying information of persons
who hold registry identification cards which is contained in an
electronic verification and authentication system is encrypted,
protected and not divulged for any purpose not specifically
authorized by law.
Sec. 45. NRS 678C.430 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678C.430 1. [Each medical cannabis establishment, in
consultation with the Board, shall maintain an inventory control
system.
2. The inventory control system required pursuant to
subsection 1 must be able to monitor and report information,
including, without limitation:
(a) Insofar as is practicable, the chain of custody and current
whereabouts, in real time, of cannabis from the point that it is
harvested at a cannabis cultivation facility until it is sold at a
medical cannabis dispensary and, if applicable, medical cannabis
production facility;
(b) The name of each person or other medical cannabis
establishment, or both, to which the establishment sold cannabis;
(c) In the case of a medical cannabis dispensary, the date on
which it sold cannabis to a person who holds a registry identification
card and, if any, the quantity of medical cannabis products sold,
measured both by weight and potency; and
(d) Such other information as the Board may require.
3. Nothing in this section prohibits more than one medical
cannabis establishment from co-owning an inventory control system
in cooperation with other medical cannabis establishments, or
sharing the information obtained therefrom.
4. A medical cannabis establishment must exercise reasonable
care to ensure that the personal identifying information of persons
who hold registry identification cards which is contained in an
inventory control system is encrypted, protected and not divulged
for any purpose not specifically authorized by law.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 44 –
5.] If a medical cannabis establishment is operated by a dual
licensee, the medical cannabis establishment may:
(a) For the purpose of tracking cannabis for medical use,
maintain a combined inventory with an adult-use cannabis
establishment operated by the dual licensee; and
(b) For the purpose of reporting on the inventory of the medical
cannabis establishment operated by the dual licensee, maintain a
combined inventory with an adult-use cannabis establishment
operated by the dual licensee and report the combined inventory
under [a single medical cannabis establishment license or] the adult-
use cannabis establishment license.
[6.] 2. If a medical cannabis establishment is operated by a
dual licensee, the medical cannabis establishment shall:
(a) For the purpose of reporting on the sales of any medical
cannabis establishment or adult-use cannabis establishment operated
by the dual licensee, designate each sale as a sale pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter or chapter 678D of NRS in its inventory
control system at the point of sale; and
(b) Verify that each person who purchases cannabis or cannabis
products in a sale designated as a sale pursuant to the provisions of
this chapter holds a valid registry identification card.
Sec. 46. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 47. NRS 678D.005 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678D.005 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 678D.010 [to
678D.040, inclusive,] , 678D.020 and 678D.030 have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 48. NRS 678D.420 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678D.420 1. An adult-use edible cannabis product or an
adult-use cannabis-infused product must be labeled in a manner
which indicates the number of servings of THC in the product,
measured in servings of a maximum of 10 milligrams per serving.
2. An adult-use cannabis product must be sold in a single
package. A single package must not contain:
(a) More than [1 ounce] 2.5 ounces of usable cannabis [or one-
eighth of an ounce] or 3,500 milligrams of concentrated cannabis.
(b) For an adult-use cannabis product sold as a capsule, more
than 100 milligrams of THC per capsule or more than [800] 1,000
milligrams of THC per package.
(c) For an adult-use cannabis product sold as a tincture, more
than [800] 1,000 milligrams of THC.
(d) For an adult-use edible cannabis product, more than 100
milligrams of THC.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 45 –
(e) For an adult-use cannabis product sold as a topical product, a
concentration of more than 6 percent THC or more than [800] 2,500
milligrams of THC per package.
(f) For an adult-use cannabis product sold as a suppository or
transdermal patch, more than 100 milligrams of THC per
suppository or transdermal patch or more than [800] 1,000
milligrams of THC per package.
(g) For any other adult-use cannabis product, more than [800]
1,000 milligrams of THC.
3. To the extent that they are inconsistent or otherwise
conflict with the regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to
NRS 678D.480, the requirements of this section do not apply to a
ready-to-consume cannabis product prepared and sold by a cannabis
consumption lounge.
Sec. 49. NRS 678D.430 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678D.430 1. If an adult-use cannabis establishment is
operated by a dual licensee, the adult-use cannabis establishment
may:
(a) For the purpose of tracking cannabis, maintain a combined
inventory with a medical cannabis establishment operated by the
dual licensee; and
(b) For the purpose of reporting on the inventory of the adult-
use cannabis establishment, maintain a combined inventory with a
medical cannabis establishment operated by the dual licensee and
report the combined inventory under [a single medical cannabis
license or] the adult-use cannabis license.
2. If a cannabis establishment is operated by a dual licensee,
the cannabis establishment shall:
(a) For the purpose of reporting on the sales of any adult-use
cannabis establishment or medical cannabis establishment operated
by the dual licensee, designate each sale as a sale pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter or chapter 678C of NRS; and
(b) Verify that each person who purchases cannabis or cannabis
products in a sale designated as a sale pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 678C of NRS holds a valid registry identification card.
3. An adult-use cannabis retail store shall not sell cannabis or
cannabis products through the use of, or accept a sale of cannabis or
cannabis products from, a third party, intermediary business, broker
or any other business that does not hold an adult-use cannabis
establishment license.
4. An adult-use cannabis retail store may contract with a third
party or intermediary business to deliver cannabis or cannabis
products only if:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 46 –
(a) Every sale of cannabis or cannabis products which is
delivered by the third party or intermediary business is made
directly from the adult-use cannabis retail store or an Internet
website, digital network or software application service of the adult-
use cannabis retail store;
(b) The third party or intermediary business does not advertise
that it sells, offers to sell or appears to sell cannabis or cannabis
products or allows the submission of an order for cannabis or
cannabis products;
(c) In addition to any other requirements imposed by the Board
by regulation, the name of the adult-use cannabis retail store and all
independent contractors who perform deliveries on behalf of the
adult-use cannabis retail store has been published on the Internet
website of the Board; and
(d) The delivery is made by a cannabis establishment agent who
is authorized to make the delivery by the adult-use cannabis retail
store by which he or she is employed.
Sec. 50. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 51. NRS 202.2483 is hereby amended to read as follows:
202.2483 1. Except as otherwise provided in [subsection]
subsections 3 [,] and 4, smoking in any form is prohibited within
indoor places of employment including, but not limited to, the
following:
(a) Child care facilities;
(b) Movie theatres;
(c) Video arcades;
(d) Government buildings and public places;
(e) Malls and retail establishments;
(f) All areas of grocery stores; and
(g) All indoor areas within restaurants.
2. Without exception, smoking in any form is prohibited within
school buildings and on school property.
3. Smoking is not prohibited in:
(a) Areas within casinos where loitering by minors is already
prohibited by state law pursuant to NRS 463.350;
(b) Completely enclosed areas with stand-alone bars, taverns
and saloons in which patrons under 21 years of age are prohibited
from entering;
(c) Age-restricted stand-alone bars, taverns and saloons;
(d) Strip clubs or brothels;
(e) Retail tobacco stores;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 47 –
(f) The area of a convention facility in which a meeting or trade
show is being held, during the time the meeting or trade show is
occurring, if the meeting or trade show:
(1) Is not open to the public;
(2) Is being produced or organized by a business relating to
tobacco or a professional association for convenience stores; and
(3) Involves the display of tobacco products; and
(g) Private residences, including private residences which may
serve as an office workplace, except if used as a child care, an adult
day care or a health care facility.
4. The smoking of cannabis in accordance with the
provisions of title 56 of NRS and the regulations adopted pursuant
thereto is not prohibited in a cannabis consumption lounge.
5. A supervisor on duty or employee of an age-restricted stand-
alone bar, tavern or saloon or a stand-alone bar, tavern or saloon
shall not allow a person who is under 21 years of age to loiter in an
age-restricted stand-alone bar, tavern or saloon or an area of a stand-
alone bar, tavern or saloon where smoking is allowed pursuant to
this section. A person who violates the provisions of this subsection
is guilty of a misdemeanor.
[5.] 6. If a supervisor on duty or employee of an age-restricted
stand-alone bar, tavern or saloon or a stand-alone bar, tavern or
saloon violates the provisions of subsection [4,] 5, the age-restricted
stand-alone bar, tavern or saloon or stand-alone bar, tavern or saloon
is liable for a civil penalty of:
(a) For the first offense, $1,000.
(b) For a second or subsequent offense, $2,000.
[6.] 7. In any prosecution or other proceeding for a violation of
the provisions of subsection [4 or] 5 [,] or 6, it is no excuse for a
supervisor, employee, age-restricted bar, tavern or saloon, or stand-
alone bar, tavern or saloon alleged to have committed the violation
to plead that a supervisor or employee believed that the person who
was permitted to loiter was 21 years of age or older.
[7.] 8. In areas or establishments where smoking is not
prohibited by this section, nothing in state law shall be construed to
prohibit the owners of said establishments from voluntarily creating
nonsmoking sections or designating the entire establishment as
smoke free.
[8.] 9. Nothing in state law shall be construed to restrict local
control or otherwise prohibit a county, city or town from adopting
and enforcing local smoking control measures that meet or exceed
the minimum applicable standards set forth in this section.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 48 –
[9.] 10. “No Smoking” signs or the international “No
Smoking” symbol shall be clearly and conspicuously posted in
every public place and place of employment where smoking is
prohibited by this section. Each public place and place of
employment where smoking is prohibited shall post, at every
entrance, a conspicuous sign clearly stating that smoking is
prohibited. All ashtrays and other smoking paraphernalia shall be
removed from any area where smoking is prohibited.
[10.] 11. Health authorities, police officers of cities or towns,
sheriffs and their deputies shall, within their respective jurisdictions,
enforce the provisions of this section and shall issue citations for
violations of this section pursuant to NRS 202.2492 and 202.24925.
[11.] 12. No person or employer shall retaliate against an
employee, applicant or customer for exercising any rights afforded
by, or attempts to prosecute a violation of, this section.
[12.] 13. For the purposes of this section, the following terms
have the following definitions:
(a) “Age-restricted stand-alone bar, tavern or saloon” means an
establishment:
(1) Devoted primarily to the sale of alcoholic beverages to be
consumed on the premises;
(2) In which food service or sales may or may not be
incidental food service or sales, in the discretion of the operator of
the establishment;
(3) In which patrons under 21 years of age are prohibited at
all times from entering the premises; and
(4) That must be located within:
(I) A physically independent building that does not share
a common entryway or indoor area with a restaurant, public place or
any other indoor workplace where smoking is prohibited by this
section; or
(II) A completely enclosed area of a larger structure,
which may include, without limitation, a strip mall or an airport,
provided that indoor windows must remain closed at all times and
doors must remain closed when not actively in use.
(b) “Cannabis” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 678A.085.
(c) “Cannabis consumption lounge” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 678A.087.
(d) “Casino” means an entity that contains a building or large
room devoted to gambling games or wagering on a variety of
events. A casino must possess a nonrestricted gaming license as
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 49 –
described in NRS 463.0177 and typically uses the word ‘casino’ as
part of its proper name.
[(c)] (e) “Child care facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 441A.030.
[(d)] (f) “Completely enclosed area” means an area that is
enclosed on all sides by any combination of solid walls, windows or
doors that extend from the floor to the ceiling.
[(e)] (g) “Government building” means any building or office
space owned or occupied by:
(1) Any component of the Nevada System of Higher
Education and used for any purpose related to the System;
(2) The State of Nevada and used for any public purpose; or
(3) Any county, city, school district or other political
subdivision of the State and used for any public purpose.
[(f)] (h) “Health authority” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 202.2485.
[(g)] (i) “Incidental food service or sales” means the service of
prepackaged food items including, but not limited to, peanuts,
popcorn, chips, pretzels or any other incidental food items that are
exempt from food licensing requirements pursuant to subsection 2
of NRS 446.870.
[(h)] (j) “Place of employment” means any enclosed area under
the control of a public or private employer which employees
frequent during the course of employment including, but not limited
to, work areas, restrooms, hallways, employee lounges, cafeterias,
conference and meeting rooms, lobbies and reception areas.
[(i)] (k) “Public places” means any enclosed areas to which the
public is invited or in which the public is permitted.
[(j)] (l) “Restaurant” means a business which gives or offers for
sale food, with or without alcoholic beverages, to the public, guests
or employees, as well as kitchens and catering facilities in which
food is prepared on the premises for serving elsewhere.
[(k)] (m) “Retail tobacco store” means a retail store utilized
primarily for the sale of tobacco products and accessories and in
which the sale of other products is merely incidental.
[(l)] (n) “School building” means all buildings on the grounds
of any public school described in NRS 388.020 and any private
school as defined in NRS 394.103.
[(m)] (o) “School property” means the grounds of any public
school described in NRS 388.020 and any private school as defined
in NRS 394.103.
[(n)] (p) “Smoking” means inhaling, exhaling, burning or
carrying any liquid or heated cigar, cigarette or pipe or any other
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 50 –
lighted or heated tobacco or plant product intended for inhalation, in
any manner or in any form. The term includes the use of an
electronic smoking device that creates an aerosol or vapor, in any
manner or in any form, and the use of any oral smoking device. As
used in this paragraph, “electronic smoking device”:
(1) Means any product containing or delivering nicotine, a
product made or derived from tobacco or any other substance
intended for human consumption that can be used by a person to
simulate smoking in the delivery of nicotine or any other substance
through inhalation of vapor or aerosol from the product.
(2) Includes any component part of a product described in
subparagraph (1), regardless of whether the component part is sold
separately.
(3) Does not include any product regulated by the United
States Food and Drug Administration pursuant to Subchapter V of
the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. §§ 352 et seq.
[(o)] (q) “Stand-alone bar, tavern or saloon” means an
establishment:
(1) Devoted primarily to the sale of alcoholic beverages to be
consumed on the premises;
(2) In which food service or sales may or may not be
incidental food service or sales, in the discretion of the operator of
the establishment;
(3) In which smoke from such establishments does not
infiltrate into areas where smoking is prohibited under the
provisions of this section; and
(4) That must be housed in either:
(I) A physically independent building that does not share
a common entryway or indoor area with a restaurant, public place or
any other indoor workplaces where smoking is prohibited by this
section; or
(II) A completely enclosed area of a larger structure, such
as a strip mall or an airport, provided that indoor windows must
remain shut at all times and doors must remain closed when not
actively in use.
[(p)] (r) “Video arcade” has the meaning ascribed to it in
paragraph (d) of subsection 3 of NRS 453.3345.
[13.] 14. Any statute or regulation inconsistent with this
section is null and void.
[14.] 15. The provisions of this section are severable. If any
provision of this section or the application thereof is declared by a
court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid or unconstitutional,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the section as a
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 51 –
whole or any provision thereof other than the part declared to be
invalid or unconstitutional.
Sec. 52. NRS 223.250 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.250 1. The Governor or his or her designee may enter
into one or more agreements with tribal governments in this State to
efficiently coordinate the cross-jurisdictional administration of the
laws of this State and the laws of tribal governments relating to the
use of cannabis. Such an agreement may include, without limitation,
provisions relating to:
(a) Criminal and civil law enforcement;
(b) Regulatory issues relating to the possession, delivery,
production, processing or use of cannabis or cannabis products;
(c) Medical and pharmaceutical research involving cannabis;
(d) The administration of laws relating to taxation;
(e) Any immunity, preemption or conflict of law relating to the
possession, delivery, production, processing, transportation or use of
cannabis or cannabis products; and
(f) The resolution of any disputes between a tribal government
and this State, which may include, without limitation, the use of
mediation or other nonjudicial processes.
2. An agreement entered into pursuant to this section must:
(a) Provide for the preservation of public health and safety;
(b) Ensure the security of cannabis establishments and the
corresponding facilities on tribal land; and
(c) Establish provisions regulating business involving cannabis
which passes between tribal land and non-tribal land in this State.
3. Any information received pursuant to the terms of an
agreement entered into pursuant to this section by a governmental
entity from a tribal government or a facility engaged in cannabis
activities operating on tribal land which relates to cannabis or a
cannabis product that is not sold or transferred to a cannabis
establishment remains the property of the tribal government, is not
a public record within the meaning of NRS 239.010 and must be
kept confidential by the governmental entity.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Cannabis” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 678A.085.
(b) “Cannabis establishment” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 678A.095.
(c) “Cannabis products” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 678A.120.
(d) “Governmental entity” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 239.005.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 52 –
(e) “Tribal government” means a federally recognized American
Indian tribe pursuant to 25 C.F.R. §§ 83.1 to [83.13,] 83.12,
inclusive.
Sec. 53. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
223.250, 224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495,
228.570, 231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 53 –
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 54 –
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, sections 35, 38 and 41 of chapter 478, Statutes of Nevada
2011 and section 2 of chapter 391, Statutes of Nevada 2013 and
unless otherwise declared by law to be confidential, all public books
and public records of a governmental entity must be open at all
times during office hours to inspection by any person, and may be
fully copied or an abstract or memorandum may be prepared from
those public books and public records. Any such copies, abstracts or
memoranda may be used to supply the general public with copies,
abstracts or memoranda of the records or may be used in any other
way to the advantage of the governmental entity or of the general
public. This section does not supersede or in any manner affect the
federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge, diminish or affect in
any other manner the rights of a person in any written book or
record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 55 –
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 54. NRS 239.0115 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.0115 1. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection
and subsection 3, notwithstanding any provision of law that has
declared a public book or record, or a part thereof, to be
confidential, if a public book or record has been in the legal custody
or control of one or more governmental entities for at least 30 years,
a person may apply to the district court of the county in which the
governmental entity that currently has legal custody or control of the
public book or record is located for an order directing that
governmental entity to allow the person to inspect or copy the public
book or record, or a part thereof. If the public book or record
pertains to a natural person, a person may not apply for an order
pursuant to this subsection until the public book or record has been
in the legal custody or control of one or more governmental entities
for at least 30 years or until the death of the person to whom the
public book or record pertains, whichever is later.
2. There is a rebuttable presumption that a person who applies
for an order as described in subsection 1 is entitled to inspect or
copy the public book or record, or a part thereof, that the person
seeks to inspect or copy.
3. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to any book or
record:
(a) Declared confidential pursuant to NRS 463.120 [.] or
678A.470.
(b) Containing personal information pertaining to a victim of
crime that has been declared by law to be confidential.
Sec. 54.3. 1. The Cannabis Advisory Commission created by
NRS 678A.300 shall create a subcommittee to conduct a study
concerning the potential regulation by the Cannabis Compliance
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 56 –
Board of consumable hemp products and the potential restriction of
the conducting of sales of such products only to persons licensed by
the Board and, for a consumable hemp product that is a beverage,
persons who have obtained any license or permit required to sell
alcoholic beverages. The study must include, without limitation:
(a) A review of existing state laws and local ordinances
governing consumable hemp products;
(b) A review of and recommendations concerning matters
relating to the enforcement of restrictions against the sale of
consumable hemp products with a THC concentration that exceeds
the maximum THC concentration established by the State
Department of Agriculture for hemp, including, without limitation:
(1) Recommendations for actions that may be taken by state
and local agencies to enforce such restrictions, including, without
limitation, the issuance of cease and desist orders, the imposition of
civil and criminal penalties and the use of other tools to enforce
such restrictions; and
(2) An identification and recommendations for the closure of
gaps in the enforcement of such restrictions, including, without
limitation, gaps in the legal authority of state and local agencies to
enforce such restrictions and gaps in the enforcement of such
restrictions in the context of sales conducted in person and through
the Internet and with respect to sales of consumable hemp products
that contain delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol, other derivatives of
tetrahydrocannabinol or synthetic cannabinoids;
(c) Recommendations for requirements for the testing,
packaging and labeling of consumable hemp products, including,
without limitation, standardized warning labels concerning any
psychoactive effects, impairment risks, allergens and drug
interactions;
(d) A review of federal laws and regulations governing
consumable hemp products and the distribution of such products in
interstate commerce and recommendations for the implementation
of safeguards to ensure that this State complies with any such laws
and regulations;
(e) An examination of the adequacy of age restrictions and
point-of-sale controls concerning the sale of consumable hemp
products, including, without limitation, an examination of the
effectiveness of practices for the verification of the age of a
purchaser of such a product both for an in-person sale and for a sale
through the Internet;
(f) Recommendations for requirements for the potency of a
consumable hemp product and the serving size of a consumable
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 57 –
hemp product, including, without limitation, the maximum
allowable milligrams of cannabinoids for each such product or for
each serving of such a product;
(g) Recommendations for the creation of a market surveillance
and reporting system concerning consumable hemp products, which
must include, without limitation:
(1) A centralized registry of consumable hemp products and
manufacturers and retailers of such products; and
(2) A system for tracking complaints of consumers, recalls of
consumer hemp products and adverse health events involving
consumer hemp products;
(h) An examination of and recommendations concerning issues
relating to the retail sale of consumable hemp products that are
beverages, including, without limitation:
(1) The classification of such products under state law;
(2) Standards for the testing, packaging and labeling of such
products;
(3) Restrictions on marketing and advertising for such
products;
(4) Practices for the verification of the age of a purchaser of
such a product, both for in-person sales and sales through the
Internet;
(5) Practices for the effective coordination between state and
local agencies who are responsible for matters relating to such
products; and
(6) The taxation of such products; and
(i) An examination of any other issues relating to consumable
hemp products that the Commission determines to be appropriate.
2. On or before November 9, 2026, the Cannabis Advisory
Commission shall submit a report of its findings, including, without
limitation, any recommendations for legislation, to:
(a) The Joint Interim Standing Committee on the Judiciary; and
(b) The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the 84th Session of the Nevada Legislature.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Consumable hemp product” means hemp, as defined in
NRS 557.160, a commodity or product containing hemp or any
other commodity or product that purports to contain cannabidiol
that:
(1) Has a THC concentration that does not exceed the
maximum THC concentration for hemp established by the State
Department of Agriculture; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 58 –
(2) Is intended for human consumption by ingestion or
inhalation or for topical application to the skin or hair of a human.
 The term does not include a commodity or product that contains
only an approved hemp component, as defined in NRS 446.844, and
no other hemp.
(b) “Hemp” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 557.160.
Sec. 54.7. 1. The Cannabis Advisory Commission created by
NRS 678A.300 shall create a subcommittee to conduct a study
concerning the taxation of cannabis and cannabis products in this
State. The study must include, without limitation:
(a) An assessment of the potential effects of:
(1) The elimination of the excise taxes imposed by
subsections 1 and 2 of NRS 372A.290 coupled with an increase to
the amount of the excise tax imposed by subsection 3 of
NRS 372A.290.
(2) The imposition of an excise tax on retail sales of
consumable hemp products, as defined in section 54.3 of this act.
(3) Other changes that may be made, in a manner that is at
least revenue neutral to the State Education Fund, to the manner in
which cannabis and cannabis products are taxed in this State.
(b) For each change for which an assessment is conducted
pursuant to paragraph (a), consideration of:
(1) The potential impact of the change on the price of
cannabis and cannabis products at retail;
(2) Changes to the manner in which the cannabis and
cannabis products are regulated which may be necessary if the
change were to be implemented;
(3) The financial impact of the change on persons who
engage in the medical and adult use of cannabis and on holders of
medical and adult-use cannabis establishment licenses;
(4) The impact of the change on the unlicensed cannabis
market and the hemp market; and
(5) The projected long-term impact of the change on the
State Education Fund.
2. On or before October 5, 2026, the Cannabis Advisory
Commission shall submit a report of its findings, including, without
limitation, any recommendations for legislation, to:
(a) The Joint Interim Standing Committee on Revenue; and
(b) The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the 84th Session of the Nevada Legislature.
Sec. 55. The amendatory provisions of sections 5, 6 and 13 to
23, inclusive, of this act apply to any judicial or administrative
proceedings commenced on or after the effective date of this act.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 59 –
Sec. 56. NRS 678C.060, 678C.100 and 678D.040 are hereby
repealed.
Sec. 57. This act becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)